Utah statutes.
49-17-104.   Creation of trust fund.
(1)  There is created the "Judges' Contributory Retirement Trust Fund" for the
purpose of paying the benefits and costs of administering this system.
(2)  The fund shall consist of all money, including interest, and assets
transferred to it under any terminated system, the money paid into it under
this system, whether in the form of cash, securities, or other assets, and of
all money received from any other source.
(3)  Custody, management, and investment of the fund shall be governed by
Chapter 11, Utah State Retirement Systems Administration.
